Utah statutes.
3-1-35.   Procedure at meeting to vote on plan of merger or consolidation --
Abandonment of merger or consolidation prior to filing articles.
(1)  At each meeting, a vote of the current members of each cooperative party
to the merger or consolidation having members and a vote of the shareholders
of each party to the merger or consolidation having stock or shares shall be
taken on the proposed plan of merger or consolidation.
(2) (a)  If the articles of incorporation or bylaws of any party to the merger
or consolidation provide for the election by members or shareholders at
district meetings of delegates to vote at annual or special meetings of the
association or noncooperative corporation, these procedures shall be followed,
and the vote of the delegates at the meeting where the plan of merger or
consolidation is voted on shall be counted in the same way and entitled to the
same weight as a vote of the delegates at any other meeting of the association
or noncooperative corporation.
(b)  Members of cooperative parties may vote in person or by signed ballot, if
voting by ballot is allowed in the association's bylaws.
(c)  Shareholders or their delegates of noncooperative parties may vote in
person or by written proxy.
(3)  The plan of merger or consolidation must be approved by a 2/3 majority
of:
(a)  the voting members of cooperative parties; and
(b)  holders or delegates of holders of the outstanding shares of
noncooperative parties.
(4)  After approval by a vote of the members and shareholders of each party to
the merger or consolidation and prior to the filing of the articles of merger
or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to
provisions set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.
